Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-718
Voluntary fire departments; maintenance; tax; limitation.

The city council in cities of the second class and board of trustees in villages having only voluntary fire departments or companies may levy a tax annually of not more than seven cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property within such cities or villages for the maintenance and benefit of such fire departments or companies. The amount of such tax shall be established at the beginning of the year and shall be included in the adopted budget statement. Upon collection of such tax, the city treasurer or village treasurer shall disburse the same upon the order of the chief of the fire department with the approval of the city council or village board of trustees.

Laws 1921, c. 198, § 1, p. 720;

C.S.1922, § 4391;

C.S.1929, § 17-589;

R.S.1943, § 17-718;

Laws 1947, c. 38, § 1, p. 150;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 21, p. 943;

Laws 1969, c. 96, § 1, p. 464;

Laws 1969, c. 145, § 24, p. 687;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 58;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 59;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 227.